California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) The governing board of each local publicly owned electric utility shall review the total annual emissions of greenhouse gases and the annual average greenhouse gas emissions intensity reported for each local publicly owned electric utility pursuant to this section and may assess whether those emissions of greenhouse gases, combined with the local publicly owned electric utility’s procurement plans for subsequent years, demonstrate adequate progress toward achieving the local publicly owned electric utility’s greenhouse gas emissions targets established pursuant to Section 9621. A local publicly owned electric utility may use existing board processes to facilitate this paragraph.

(h) Information submitted to the Energy Commission pursuant to this section that is a trade secret, as defined
 in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, shall not be released except in an aggregated form such that trade secrets cannot be discerned.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reporting, evaluation, and progress assessment requirements of this section shall not constitute a new electricity procurement obligation for load-serving entities or for local publicly owned electric utilities.

(j) The requirements of this section shall not apply to the following types of retail suppliers:

(1) Load-serving entities that are not subject to the requirements of Section 454.52.

(2) Local publicly owned electric utilities that are not subject to the requirements of Section 9621.

(k) In developing the rules and procedures specified in this section, the Energy Commission shall seek to minimize the reporting burden and the cost of reporting that it imposes on retail suppliers.

(l) The Energy Commission may modify or adjust the requirements of this section for any electrical corporation with 60,000 or fewer customer accounts in the state or any retail supplier with an annual electrical demand of less than 1,000 gigawatthours, if the Energy Commission finds that the costs to comply with the requirements of this section unduly burden the electrical corporation or retail supplier.

(m) The Energy Commission may delay when retail suppliers shall begin reporting pursuant to this section if the Energy Commission determines that it is infeasible or unreasonably costly for retail suppliers to obtain the necessary data or develop the necessary reporting
 tools within the timeframe established in subdivision (b).

(n) The Energy Commission may verify environmental and procurement claims made by retail suppliers.

(o) This section shall not apply to generators providing electric service onsite, under an over-the-fence transaction as described in Section 218, or to an affiliate or affiliates, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 372.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.   (SB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Reliable Electric Service Investments Act [399. - 399.9.]

399.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Reliable Electric Service Investments Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that safe, reliable electric service is of utmost importance to the citizens of this state, and its economy.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that in order to ensure that the citizens of this state continue to receive safe, reliable, affordable, and
 environmentally sustainable electric service, it is essential that prudent investments continue to be made in all of the following areas:

(1) To protect the integrity of the electric distribution grid.

(2) To ensure an adequately sized and trained utility workforce.

(3) To ensure cost-effective energy efficiency improvements.

(4) To achieve a sustainable supply of renewable energy.

(5) To advance public interest research, development and demonstration programs not adequately provided by competitive and regulated markets.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to reaffirm, without requiring revision, California’s doctrine, as
 reflected in regulatory and judicial decisions, regarding electrical corporations’ reasonable opportunity to recover costs and investments associated with their electric distribution grid and the reasonable opportunity to attract capital for investment on reasonable terms.

(e) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Acting under applicable constitutional and statutory authorities, the Public Utilities Commission and the boards of local publicly owned electric utilities have included in regulated electricity prices, investments that are essential to maintaining system reliability, reducing California electricity users’ bills, and mitigating environmental costs of California users’ electricity consumption.

(2) Among the most important of these “system benefits” investments categories are
 energy efficiency, renewable energy, and public interest research, development and demonstration (RD&D).

(3) Energy efficiency investments funded from California’s usage-based charges on electricity distribution help improve systemwide reliability by reducing demand in times and areas of system congestion, and at the same time reduce all California electricity users’ costs. These investments also significantly reduce environmental costs associated with California’s electricity consumption, including, but not limited to, degradation of the state’s air, water, and land resources.

(4) California’s in-state renewable energy resources help alleviate supply deficits that could threaten electric system reliability, reduce environmental costs associated with California’s electricity consumption, and increase the diversity of the electricity system’s fuel mix, reducing electricity
 users’ exposure to fossil-fuel price volatility.

(5) California’s public interest RD&D investments enhance private and regulated sector investment in electricity system technologies, and are designed specifically to help ensure sustained improvement in the economic and environmental performance of the distribution, transmission, and generation and end-use systems that serve California electricity users.

(6) California has established a long tradition of recovering system benefits investments through usage-based electricity charges, which is reflected in at least two decades of electricity price regulation by the commission, the boards of local publicly owned electric utilities, and the mandate of the Legislature in Chapter 854 of the Statutes of 1996 (Assembly Bill 1890 of the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature) and Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 1997 (Senate Bill 90
 of the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature).

(7) Unless the Legislature acts to extend the mandate of this article for minimum levels of usage based system benefits charges, California electricity users are at substantial risk of higher economic and environmental costs and degraded reliability.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1050) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 512, Sec. 23.   Effective September 27, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

399.2.

(a) (1) It is the policy of this state, and the intent of the Legislature, to reaffirm that each electrical corporation shall continue to operate its electric distribution grid in its service territory and shall do so in a safe, reliable, efficient, and cost-effective manner.

(2) In furtherance of this policy, it is the intent of the Legislature that each electrical corporation shall continue to be responsible for operating its own electric
 distribution grid including, but not limited to, owning, controlling, operating, managing, maintaining, planning, engineering, designing, and constructing its own electric distribution grid, emergency response and restoration, service connections, service turnons and turnoffs, and service inquiries relating to the operation of its electric distribution grid, subject to the commission’s authority.

(b) In order to ensure the continued efficient use, and cost-effective, safe, and reliable operation of the electric distribution grid, each electrical corporation shall continue to operate its electric distribution grid in its service territory consistent with Section 330.

(c) In carrying out the purposes of this section, each electrical corporation shall continue to make reasonable investments in its electric distribution grid. Each electrical corporation shall continue to have a
 reasonable opportunity to fully recover from all customers of the electrical corporation, in a manner determined by the commission pursuant to this code, all of the following:

(1) Reasonable investments in its electric distribution grid.

(2) A reasonable return on the investments in its electric distribution grid.

(3) Reasonable costs to operate its electric distribution grid.

(d) For purposes of this section, the term “electric distribution grid” means those facilities owned or operated by an electrical corporation that are not under the control of the Independent System Operator and that are used to transmit, deliver, or furnish electricity for light, heat, or power.

(e) Nothing in this
 section shall be construed to alter or to affect any of the following:

(1) Section 216, 218, or 2827.

(2) The authority of the commission to establish and enforce standards and tariff conditions for the interconnection of customer-owned facilities to the electric distribution grid.

(3) The ratemaking authority of the commission under this code.

(4) The authority of the commission to establish rules governing the extension of service to new customers.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or affect any authority or lack of authority of the commission regarding the ownership and operation of new electric generation used in whole, or in part, for the purpose of maintaining
 or enhancing the reliability of the electric distribution grid.

(g) Nothing in this section diminishes or expands any existing authority of a local governmental entity.

(h) The commission shall require every electrical corporation operating an electric distribution grid to inform all customers who request residential service connections via telephone of the availability of the California Alternative Rates for Energy (CARE) program and how they may qualify for and obtain these services and shall accept applications for the CARE program according to procedures specified by the commission. Electrical corporations shall recover the reasonable costs of implementing this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1050, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

399.2.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 1001 to 1013, inclusive, an application of an electrical corporation for a certificate authorizing the construction of new transmission facilities is necessary to the provision of electric service if the commission finds that the new facility is necessary to facilitate achievement of the renewables portfolio standard established in Article 16 (commencing with Section
 399.11).

(b) With respect to a transmission facility described in subdivision (a), the commission shall take all feasible actions to ensure that the transmission rates established by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission are fully reflected in any retail rates established by the commission. These actions shall include all of the following:

(1) Making findings, where supported by an evidentiary record, that those transmission facilities provide benefit to the transmission network and are necessary to facilitate the achievement of the renewables portfolio standard established in Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11).

(2) Directing the utility to which the generator will be interconnected, where the direction is not preempted by federal law, to seek the recovery through general transmission rates of the costs
 associated with the transmission facilities.

(3) Asserting the positions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in appropriate proceedings.

(4) Allowing recovery in retail rates of any increase in transmission costs incurred by an electrical corporation resulting from the construction of the transmission facilities that are not approved for recovery in transmission rates by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission after the commission determines that the costs were prudently incurred.

(c) (1) The commission, prior to making a finding pursuant to subdivision (a), may approve an advice letter from an electrical corporation seeking, for a specific transmission project, a finding of eligibility for cost recovery pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b),
 if the electrical corporation certifies in the advice letter, in a form prescribed by the commission, that it expects that the facility will be necessary to facilitate achievement of the renewables portfolio standard established pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11). The electrical corporation’s ultimate recovery of construction costs shall be contingent upon the commission finding, pursuant to subdivision (a), that the facility is necessary to facilitate achievement of the renewables portfolio standard and that the costs were prudently incurred.

(2) Prior to making a finding pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission may approve an advice letter from an electrical corporation requesting retail rate cost recovery for costs incurred prior to permitting or certification for potential transmission facilities if the electrical corporation certifies in the advice letter, in a form prescribed by the commission, that it expects that the facility will be necessary to
 facilitate achievement of the renewables portfolio standard established pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11). The electrical corporation’s ultimate recovery of costs incurred prior to permitting or certification shall be contingent upon the commission finding that the electrical corporation administered the approved costs reasonably and prudently.

(3) Any commission determination pursuant to this subdivision is not binding upon the commission when determining the need for the transmission facilities pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1001) or Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11).

(d) Any cost recovery pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) shall be limited to costs that are not approved for recovery in transmission rates by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 1954)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

399.3.

Nothing in Section 399.2 shall be construed to preclude any of California’s local publicly owned electric utilities from exercising authority to operate their electric distribution grid as provided under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1050, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

399.4.

(a) (1) In order to ensure that prudent investments in energy efficiency continue to be made that produce cost-effective energy savings, reduce customer demand, and contribute to the safe and reliable operation of the electrical distribution grid, it is the policy of this state and the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall supervise the administration of cost-effective energy efficiency programs authorized pursuant to its statutory authority, including Sections 381, 381.1, 381.2, 381.5, 382, 384.5, 400, 454.5, 454.55, 454.56, 589, 701.1, 749, and 769, Article 10 (commencing with Section 890) of Chapter 4, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2781) of Part 2.

(2) As used in this section, the term “energy efficiency” includes, but
 is not limited to, cost-effective activities to achieve peak load reduction that improve end-use efficiency, lower customers’ bills, and reduce system needs.

(b) (1) If a customer or contractor is the recipient of a rebate or incentive offered by a public utility for an energy efficiency improvement or installation of energy efficient components, equipment, or appliances in a building, the public utility shall provide the rebate or incentive only if the customer or contractor certifies that the improvement or installation has complied with any applicable permitting requirements, including any applicable specifications or requirements set forth in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), and, if a contractor performed the installation or improvement, that the contractor holds the appropriate license for the work performed.

(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1), if a customer or contractor is the recipient of a rebate or incentive offered by a public utility for the purchase or installation of central air conditioning or a heat pump, and their related fans, the public utility shall provide the rebate or incentive only if the customer or contractor provides proof of permit closure. The public utility is not responsible for verifying the proof of permit closure documentation provided by the customer or contractor.

(3) This subdivision does not imply or create authority or responsibility, or expand existing authority or responsibility, of a public utility for the enforcement of the building energy and water efficiency standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25402 of the Public Resources Code, or appliance efficiency standards and certification requirements adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25402 of the
 Public Resources Code.

(4) This subdivision does not limit the authority of the commission to impose any additional requirements on a recipient of any rebate or incentive.

(c) The commission, in evaluating energy efficiency investments under its statutory authority, shall also ensure that local and regional interests, multifamily dwellings, and energy service industry capabilities are incorporated into program portfolio design and that local governments, community-based organizations, and energy efficiency service providers are encouraged to participate in program implementation where appropriate.

(d) The commission, in a new or existing proceeding, shall review and update its policies governing energy efficiency programs funded by utility customers to facilitate achieving the targets established pursuant to
 subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code. In updating its policies, the commission shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Authorize market transformation programs with appropriate levels of funding to achieve deeper energy efficiency savings.

(2) Authorize pay for performance programs that link incentives directly to measured energy savings. As part of pay for performance programs authorized by the commission, customers should be reasonably compensated for developing and implementing an energy efficiency plan, with a portion of their incentive reserved pending post project measurement results.

(3) Authorize programs to achieve deeper savings through operational, behavioral, and retrocommissioning activities.

(4) Ensure
 that customers have certainty in the values and methodology used to determine energy efficiency incentives by basing the amount of any incentives provided by gas and electrical corporations on the values and methodology contained in the executed customer agreement. Incentive payments shall be based on measured results.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 210.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

399.8.

(a) In order to ensure that the citizens of this state continue to receive safe, reliable, affordable, and environmentally sustainable electric service, it is the policy of this state and the intent of the Legislature that prudent investments in energy efficiency, renewable energy, and research, development and demonstration shall continue to be made.

(b) (1) Every customer of an electrical corporation shall pay a nonbypassable system
 benefits charge authorized pursuant to this article. The system benefits charge shall fund energy efficiency, renewable energy, and research, development and demonstration.

(2) Local publicly owned electric utilities shall continue to collect and administer system benefits charges pursuant to Section 385.

(c) (1) The commission shall require each electrical corporation to identify a separate rate component to collect revenues to fund energy efficiency, renewable energy, and research, development and demonstration programs authorized pursuant to this section beginning January 1, 2002, and ending January 1, 2012. The rate component shall be a nonbypassable element of the local distribution service and collected on the basis of usage.

(2) This rate component may not exceed, for any tariff schedule,
 the level of the rate component that was used to recover funds authorized pursuant to Section 381 on January 1, 2000. If the amounts specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) are not recovered fully in any year, the commission shall reset the rate component to restore the unrecovered balance, provided that the rate component may not exceed, for any tariff schedule, the level of the rate component that was used to recover funds authorized pursuant to Section 381 on January 1, 2000. Pending restoration, any annual shortfalls shall be allocated pro rata among the three funding categories in the proportions established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(d) The commission shall order San Diego Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company to collect these funds commencing on January 1, 2002, as follows:

(1) Two hundred
 twenty-eight million dollars ($228,000,000) per year in total for energy efficiency and conservation activities, sixty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($65,500,000) in total per year for renewable energy, and sixty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($62,500,000) in total per year for research, development and demonstration. The funds for energy efficiency and conservation activities shall continue to be allocated in proportions established for the year 2000 as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 381.

(2) The amounts shall be adjusted annually at a rate equal to the lesser of the annual growth in electric commodity sales or inflation, as defined by the gross domestic product deflator.

(e) The commission shall ensure that each electrical corporation allocates funds transferred by the Energy Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 25743 in a manner that maximizes the economic benefit to all customer classes that funded the New Renewable Resources Account.

(f) The commission and the Energy Commission shall retain and continue their oversight responsibilities as set forth in Sections 381 and 383, and Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 25620) and Chapter 8.6 (commencing with Section 25740) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) An applicant for the Large Nonresidential Standard Performance Contract Program funded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and an electrical corporation shall promptly attempt to resolve disputes that arise related to the program’s guidelines and parameters prior to entering into a program agreement. The applicant shall provide the electrical corporation with written notice of any dispute. Within 10 business days after receipt of the notice, the parties shall meet
 to resolve the dispute. If the dispute is not resolved within 10 business days after the date of the meeting, the electrical corporation shall notify the applicant of his or her right to file a complaint with the commission, which complaint shall describe the grounds for the complaint, injury, and relief sought. The commission shall issue its findings in response to a filed complaint within 30 business days of the date of receipt of the complaint. Prior to issuance of its findings, the commission shall provide a copy of the complaint to the electrical corporation, which shall provide a response to the complaint to the commission within five business days of the date of receipt. During the dispute period, the amount of estimated financial incentives shall be held in reserve until the dispute is resolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 685, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

399.9.

(a) No part of this article shall be construed to alter or affect the low-income funding provisions set forth in Section 382. Programs provided to low-income electricity customers, including but not limited to, targeted energy efficiency services and the California Alternative Rates for Energy Program shall continue to be funded as set forth in Section 382.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to affect the jurisdiction of the commission over electric
 distribution service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1050, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program [399.11. - 399.33.]

399.11.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In order to attain a target of generating 20 percent of total retail sales of electricity in California from eligible renewable energy resources by December 31, 2013, 33 percent by December 31, 2020, 50 percent by December 31, 2026, and 60 percent by December 31, 2030, it is the intent of the Legislature that the commission and the Energy Commission implement the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program described in this article.

(b) Achieving the renewables portfolio standard through the procurement of various electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources is intended to provide unique benefits to California, including all of the
 following, each of which independently justifies the program:

(1) Displacing fossil fuel consumption within the state.

(2) Adding new electrical generating facilities in the transmission network within the WECC service area.

(3) Reducing air pollution, particularly criteria pollutant emissions and toxic air contaminants, in the state.

(4) Meeting the state’s climate change goals by reducing emissions of greenhouse gases associated with electrical generation.

(5) Promoting stable retail rates for electric service.

(6) Meeting the state’s need for a diversified and balanced energy generation portfolio.

(7) Assisting with meeting the state’s resource adequacy requirements.

(8) Contributing to the safe and reliable operation of the electrical grid, including providing predictable electrical supply, voltage support, lower line losses, and congestion relief.

(9) Implementing the state’s transmission and land use planning activities related to development of eligible renewable energy resources.

(c) The California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program is intended to complement the Renewable Energy Resources Program administered by the Energy Commission and established pursuant to Chapter 8.6 (commencing with Section 25740) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) New and modified electric
 transmission facilities may be necessary to facilitate the state achieving its renewables portfolio standard targets.

(e) (1) Supplying electricity to California end-use customers that is generated by eligible renewable energy resources is necessary to improve California’s air quality and public health, particularly in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, and the commission shall ensure rates are just and reasonable, and are not significantly affected by the procurement requirements of this article. This electricity may be generated anywhere in the interconnected grid that includes many states, and areas of both Canada and Mexico.

(2) This article requires generating resources located outside of California that are able to supply that electricity to California end-use customers to be treated identically
 to generating resources located within the state, without discrimination.

(3) California electrical corporations have already executed, and the commission has approved, power purchase agreements with eligible renewable energy resources located outside of California that will supply electricity to California end-use customers. These resources will fully count toward meeting the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 312, Sec. 2.   (SB 100)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

399.12.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Conduit hydroelectric facility” means a facility for the generation of electricity that uses only the hydroelectric potential of an existing pipe, ditch, flume, siphon, tunnel, canal, or other manmade conduit that is operated to distribute water for a beneficial use.

(b) “Balancing authority” means the responsible entity that integrates resource plans ahead of time, maintains load-interchange generation balance within a balancing authority area, and supports interconnection frequency in real time.

(c) “Balancing authority area” means
 the collection of generation, transmission, and loads within the metered boundaries of the area within which the balancing authority maintains the electrical load-resource balance.

(d) “California balancing authority” is a balancing authority with control over a balancing authority area primarily located in this state and operating for retail sellers and local publicly owned electric utilities subject to the requirements of this article and includes the Independent System Operator (ISO) and a local publicly owned electric utility operating a transmission grid that is not under the operational control of the ISO. A California balancing authority is responsible for the operation of the transmission grid within its metered boundaries which is not limited by the political boundaries of the State of California.

(e) “Eligible renewable energy resource” means an electrical generating
 facility that meets the definition of a “renewable electrical generation facility” in Section 25741 of the Public Resources Code, subject to the following:

(1) (A) An existing small hydroelectric generation facility of 30 megawatts or less shall be eligible only if a retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility procured the electricity from the facility as of December 31, 2005. A new hydroelectric facility that commences generation of electricity after December 31, 2005, is not an eligible renewable energy resource if it will cause an adverse impact on instream beneficial uses or cause a change in the volume or timing of streamflow.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a conduit hydroelectric facility of 30 megawatts or less that commenced operation before January 1, 2006, is an eligible renewable energy resource. A conduit hydroelectric facility
 of 30 megawatts or less that commences operation after December 31, 2005, is an eligible renewable energy resource so long as it does not cause an adverse impact on instream beneficial uses or cause a change in the volume or timing of streamflow.

(C) A facility approved by the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility prior to June 1, 2010, for procurement to satisfy renewable energy procurement obligations adopted pursuant to former Section 387, shall be certified as an eligible renewable energy resource by the Energy Commission pursuant to this article, if the facility is a “renewable electrical generation facility” as defined in Section 25741 of the Public Resources Code.

(D) (i) A small hydroelectric generation unit with a nameplate capacity not exceeding 40 megawatts that is operated as part of a water supply or conveyance system is an
 eligible renewable energy resource only for the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility that procured the electricity from the unit as of December 31, 2005. No unit shall be eligible pursuant to this subparagraph if an application for certification is submitted to the Energy Commission after January 1, 2013. Only one retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility shall be deemed to have procured electricity from a given unit as of December 31, 2005.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a local publicly owned electric utility that meets the criteria of subdivision (j) of Section 399.30 may sell to another local publicly owned electric utility electricity from small hydroelectric generation units that qualify as eligible renewable energy resources under clause (i), and that electricity may be used by the local publicly owned electric utility that purchased the electricity to meet its renewables portfolio standard procurement
 requirements. The total of all those sales from the utility shall be no greater than 100,000 megawatthours of electricity.

(iii) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this subparagraph are intended to clarify existing law and apply from December 10, 2011.

(2) (A) A facility engaged in the combustion of municipal solid waste shall not be considered an eligible renewable energy resource.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply to generation before January 1, 2017, from a facility located in Stanislaus County that was operational prior to September 26, 1996.

(f) “Procure” means to acquire through ownership or contract.

(g) “Procurement entity” means any
 person or corporation authorized by the commission to enter into contracts to procure eligible renewable energy resources on behalf of customers of a retail seller pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 399.13.

(h) (1) “Renewable energy credit” means a certificate of proof associated with the generation of electricity from an eligible renewable energy resource, issued through the accounting system established by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 399.25, that one unit of electricity was generated and delivered by an eligible renewable energy resource.

(2) “Renewable energy credit” includes all renewable and environmental attributes associated with the production of electricity from the eligible renewable energy resource, except for an emissions reduction credit issued pursuant to Section 40709 of the Health and Safety Code and any credits or payments
 associated with the reduction of solid waste and treatment benefits created by the utilization of biomass or biogas fuels.

(3) (A) Electricity generated by an eligible renewable energy resource attributable to the use of nonrenewable fuels, beyond a de minimis quantity used to generate electricity in the same process through which the facility converts renewable fuel to electricity, shall not result in the creation of a renewable energy credit. The Energy Commission shall set the de minimis quantity of nonrenewable fuels for each renewable energy technology at a level of no more than 2 percent of the total quantity of fuel used by the technology to generate electricity. The Energy Commission may adjust the de minimis quantity for an individual facility, up to a maximum of 5 percent, if it finds that all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The facility
 demonstrates that the higher quantity of nonrenewable fuel will lead to an increase in generation from the eligible renewable energy facility that is significantly greater than generation from the nonrenewable fuel alone.

(ii) The facility demonstrates that the higher quantity of nonrenewable fuels will reduce the variability of its electrical output in a manner that results in net environmental benefits to the state.

(iii) The higher quantity of nonrenewable fuel is limited to either natural gas or hydrogen derived by reformation of a fossil fuel.

(B) Electricity generated by a small hydroelectric generation facility shall not result in the creation of a renewable energy credit unless the facility meets the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(C) Electricity generated by a conduit hydroelectric generation facility shall not result in the creation of a renewable energy credit unless the facility meets the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(D) Electricity generated by a facility engaged in the combustion of municipal solid waste shall not result in the creation of a renewable energy credit. This subparagraph does not apply to renewable energy credits that were generated before January 1, 2017, by a facility engaged in the combustion of municipal solid waste located in Stanislaus County that was operational prior to September 26, 1996, and sold pursuant to contacts entered into before January 1, 2017.

(i) “Renewables portfolio standard” means the specified percentage of electricity generated by eligible renewable energy
 resources that a retail seller or a local publicly owned electric utility is required to procure pursuant to this article.

(j) “Retail seller” means an entity engaged in the retail sale of electricity to end-use customers located within the state, including any of the following:

(1) An electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218.

(2) A community choice aggregator. A community choice aggregator shall participate in the renewables portfolio standard program subject to the same terms and conditions applicable to an electrical corporation.

(3) An electric service provider, as defined in Section 218.3. The electric service provider shall be subject to the same terms and conditions applicable to an electrical corporation pursuant to this article. This
 paragraph does not impair a contract entered into between an electric service provider and a retail customer prior to the suspension of direct access by the commission pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code.

(4) “Retail seller” does not include any of the following:

(A) A corporation or person employing cogeneration technology or producing electricity consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 218.

(B) The Department of Water Resources acting in its capacity pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(C) A local publicly owned electric utility.

(k) “WECC” means the Western Electricity Coordinating Council of the North American Electric Reliability
 Corporation, or a successor to the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   (SB 1393)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

399.12.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 399.12, a small hydroelectric generation facility that satisfies the criteria for an eligible renewable energy resource pursuant to Section 399.12 shall not lose its eligibility if efficiency improvements undertaken after January 1, 2008, cause the generating capacity of the facility to exceed 30 megawatts, and the efficiency improvements do not result in an adverse impact on instream beneficial uses or cause a change in the volume or timing of streamflow. The entire generating capacity of the facility shall be eligible.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 399.12, the incremental increase in the amount of electricity generated from a hydroelectric generation facility as a result of efficiency improvements
 at the facility, is electricity from an eligible renewable energy resource, without regard to the electrical output of the facility, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The incremental increase is the result of efficiency improvements from a retrofit that do not result in an adverse impact on instream beneficial uses or cause a change in the volume or timing of streamflow.

(2) The hydroelectric generation facility meets one of the following certification mechanisms:
